Florida, session 2026, HB1313.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as "Vassallo's Law."
Section 2. Section 901.155, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
901.155 Persons who surrender to law enforcement when no
warrant has been issued.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as in
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1313 2026
s. 943.10(1).
(b) "Office" means the office of a law enforcement agency
which is accessible to the public.
(c) "Surrendering person" means a person who enters an
office and attempts to be taken into custody by a law
enforcement agency for a violation of criminal law when no
warrant for such person's arrest has been issued.
(2) A law enforcement agency shall implement a procedure
for interviewing a surrendering person. Each law enforcement
agency may develop its own procedure, which shall include, but
not be limited to, all of the following:
(a) The staff member who greets persons who enter the
office shall do all of the following:
1. Document identification and contact information for the
surrendering person.
2. Notify an on-site law enforcement officer that a
surrendering person has come to the office.
3. Determine whether the law enforcement agency has issued
an alert to be on the lookout for a person who meets the
description of the surrendering person.
(b) Upon notification that a surrendering person has come
to the office, the law enforcement officer shall immediately
respond to the place where the surrendering person is located
and shall conduct a voluntary interview of such person.
(c) If, while interviewing the surrendering person, the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1313 2026
law enforcement officer determines that such person may have
committed a criminal offense in another jurisdiction, the law
enforcement officer shall determine whether the law enforcement
agency in the other jurisdiction has issued an alert to be on
the lookout for a person who meets the description of the
surrendering person.
(3) A law enforcement officer who interviews a
surrendering person under this section may:
(a) Temporarily detain or arrest such person if the
requirements of s. 901.151 are met.
(b) Arrest such person without a warrant if any of the
circumstances in s. 901.15 arise.
(4) If a law enforcement officer who interviews a
surrendering person under this section determines that such
person appears to meet the criteria for involuntary examination,
pursuant to s. 394.463, he or she shall deliver the person or
have him or her delivered to the nearest receiving facility for
examination and shall execute a written report detailing the
circumstances under which the person was taken into custody.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1313-00